Maine, session 132, LD1058.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §2723-A, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Coordination of benefits for dental insurance. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a
policy may not coordinate benefits when an insured is covered under more than one policy
that provides benefits for dental services.